Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2723.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that, according to the most recent tax exemption study published by the department of revenue, there are currently 786 tax exemptions for the major state and local tax sources in Washington. A number of these tax exemptions have been unchanged in law for a long time and exist as the result of private interests securing preferential tax treatment. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the state's tax code must be periodically reviewed and updated to ensure that tax policy reflects our modern economy and provides adequate revenue to fund necessary and essential services to support the well-being of Washingtonians. Thus, it is the intent of the legislature to remove these tax preferences in order to increase revenue to the state's general fund to maintain essential state services.Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.02565 and 2022 c 16 s 146 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(c)(i) ((The))Until July 1, 2027, the exemption under this section is in the form of a remittance for a gas distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, claiming the exemption for machinery and equipment used for the production of compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas for use as a transportation fuel.(ii) A gas distribution business claiming an exemption from state and local tax in the form of a remittance under this section must pay the tax under RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes. Beginning July 1, 2017, the gas distribution business may then apply to the department for remittance of state and local sales and use taxes. A gas distribution business may not apply for a remittance more frequently than once a quarter. The gas distribution business must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The gas distribution business must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to determine whether the business is entitled to an exemption under this section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents describing the machinery and equipment.(iii) The department must determine eligibility under this section based on the information provided by the gas distribution business, which is subject to audit verification by the department. The department must on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying businesses who submitted applications during the previous quarter.(iv) Beginning July 1, ((2028))2027, a gas distribution business may not apply for a refund under this section or RCW 82.12.02565.(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation. "Machinery and equipment" also includes digital goods.(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:(i) Hand-powered tools;(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if the machinery and equipment:(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal property;(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal property;(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation;(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package, or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or transported; or(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.(d) "Manufacturer" means a person that qualifies as a manufacturer under RCW 82.04.110. "Manufacturer" also includes a person that:(i) Prints newspapers or other materials; or(ii) Is engaged in the development of prewritten computer software that is not transferred to purchasers by means of tangible storage media.(e) "Manufacturing" means only those activities that come within the definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW, or would be taxed as such if such activity were conducted in this state or if not for an exemption or deduction. "Manufacturing" also includes printing newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW if the activity is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.(f) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles, substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed material leaves the manufacturing site. With respect to the production of class A or exceptional quality biosolids by a wastewater treatment facility, the manufacturing operation begins at the point where class B biosolids undergo additional processing to achieve class A or exceptional quality standards. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the term also includes that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not include the preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.(g) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.(h) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or processor for hire.(i) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal property.(j) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property leaves the testing site. The term also includes the testing of tangible personal property for use in that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not include the testing of tangible personal property for use in the production of electricity by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.(3) This section does not apply (a) to sales of machinery and equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development, or testing of cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products, or (b) to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving such machinery and equipment.(4) The exemptions in this section do not apply to an ineligible person. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(a) "Affiliated group" means a group of two or more entities that are either:(i) Affiliated as defined in RCW 82.32.655; or(ii) Permitted to file a consolidated return for federal income tax purposes.(b) "Ineligible person" means all members of an affiliated group if all of the following apply:(i) At least one member of the affiliated group was registered with the department to do business in Washington state on or before July 1, 1981;(ii) As of August 1, 2015, the combined employment in this state of the affiliated group exceeds forty thousand full-time and part-time employees, based on data reported to the employment security department by the affiliated group; and(iii) The business activities of the affiliated group primarily include development, sales, and licensing of computer software and services.Sec. 3. RCW 82.12.02565 and 2022 c 16 s 156 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development operation, to the use by a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a testing operation, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.(2) The definitions, conditions, and requirements in RCW 82.08.02565 apply to this section.(3) ((This))Until July 1, 2027, this section does not apply to the use of (a) machinery and equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development, or testing of cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products, or (b) labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving such machinery and equipment.(4) The exemptions in this section do not apply to an ineligible person as defined in RCW 82.08.02565.Sec. 4. RCW 82.12.022 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as a consumer.(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.(3) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.(4) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.(5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2027.(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(6) ((The))Until July 1, 2027, the tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.(7) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by a silicon smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.16.315.(8) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.(9) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the consumer to the department.(10) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the department may require by rule.(11) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.Sec. 5. RCW 82.12.022 and 2017 c 135 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as a consumer.(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.(3) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.(4) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.(5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2027.(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(6) ((The))Until July 1, 2027, the tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.(7) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.(8) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the consumer to the department.(9) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the department may require by rule.(10) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.Sec. 6. RCW 82.14.230 and 2014 c 216 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governing body of any city, while not required by legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the purposes authorized by this chapter, fix and impose on every person a use tax for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas in the city as a consumer.(2) The tax is imposed in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the tax on natural gas businesses under RCW 35.21.870 in the city in which the article is used. The "value of the article used," does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a natural gas business in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under RCW 35.21.870.(3) The tax imposed under this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 35.21.870 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.(4) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 35.21.870 by another municipality or other unit of local government with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another municipality or other unit of local government with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.(5) The use tax imposed must be paid by the consumer. The administration and collection of the tax imposed is pursuant to RCW 82.14.050.(6) ((The))Until July 1, 2027, the tax authorized by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.Sec. 7. RCW 82.16.310 and 2019 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to sales by a gas distribution business of:(a) ((Compressed))Until July 1, 2027, compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas, where the compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas is to be sold or used as transportation fuel;(b) ((Natural))Until July 1, 2027, natural gas from which the buyer manufactures compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas, where the compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas is to be sold or used as transportation fuel; or(c) Renewable natural gas.(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.(3) For the purposes of this section, "transportation fuel" means fuel for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.320, a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310, or a locomotive or railroad car.(4) For the purpose of this section, "renewable natural gas" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 54.04.190.Sec. 8. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 1407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, part VII of ((this act))chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and section 4, Laws of 2026 (section 4 of this act) expire((s)) July 1, 2027.(b)(i) If a person must make repayment under section 708 of this act, part VII of ((this act))chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and section 4, Laws of 2026 (section 4 of this act) expire((s)) January 1, 2024.(ii) Section 706 of this act expires January 1, 2018.(2) If the contingent expiration date in subsection (1)(b) of this section occurs, the department of revenue must provide written notice of the expiration date of part VII of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.(3) If the contingent expiration date in subsection (1)(b) of this section occurs, the joint legislative audit and review committee is not required to perform the evaluation required in section 701 of this act.--- END ---